scribus/dicts/hyph_af.dic
ISO8859-1
.aange5d
.aard5a
.aart4
.aar5tj
.a4bak
.a4bl
.ab5la
.a4br
.a5ch
.a4fe
.a4fo
.af3oo
.a3kw
.a4l3ee
.a2lo
.al3om
.al4we
.a5mo
.am3p.
.an3d
.an5gl
.ang5st
.an5tr
.a5pe
.a3pl
.a3ru
.aset5i
.as5p
.a3sti
.a5straa
.a3th
.bakke4
.bakker5
.begun5
.be3la
.be4lof
.be4t3j
.bla3s
.bla5s.
.bli2
.broe5k.
.by1
.cre5
.d4
.de3i.
.dek5s
.dem4
.di4s
.d2j
.dors5t
.dut3
.e5d
.ede4
.ee4
.eet3
.ei3s
.eni4
.e4nof
.en4t3j
.en5tr
.e3ro
.e2s3
.e4s5k
.es5p
.e4st
.es5tr
.eu5
.euro5
.europe5ë
.f4
.f5ie.
.fluit5j
.g4
.ge5re
.ge3s
.ge5sk
.gu3an
.gun5sti
.hang5en
.hout4j
.i5d4
.i5f
.i3la
.i2n1
.in5d4
.i4ne
.in5g4
.in5sl
.in5t
.i5p
.i3sa
.ja4g
.k4
.ka5t.
.khoe5
.l4
.la3m.
.le4k
.l5e4tj
.lo5b.
.lo4sk
.lu3k
.m4
.mo4sk
.mun2
.n4
.na5l
.na3p
.na1s
.nes3t
.ne4t3j
.net5s
.ni2e
.no4g3
.nok3
.o2
.o5d
.o4e
.oe4r3
.oes3
.offe5ra
.o3go
.o3ka
.o3l
.o4ma
.om3el
.on5d
.onde4
.onder5
.on1e
.on3i
.on3k
.on1o
.on5sk
.on2t
.on4tee
.ont5eer
.oop5
.oor5
.oorwo5ë
.o4p5erd
.op5l
.o4p5r
.o3ra
.o3re
.os3k
.o3to
.p4
.pan5t.
.par5t
.pe4ni
.pe5ri
.per4s5k
.pry4
.pu5ta
.ra5y
.re1f
.regis5
.re4k5as
.rel5ië
.re4ma
.re3s
.res5l
.ri2b
.rie4
.ries5
.ro2l3
.ro5s.
.ryk3a
.s4
.se5m
.se3ra
.ses5t
.si5o
.st4
.ster4t5
.sy1
.t4
.ta3gl
.te3ra
.tikmas5
.tou5
.ts4
.tu5to
.t5ys
.u5b
.u5g
.ui2
.uil3
.uit1
.ui5tji
.un5s
.u5tra
.vie4r
.vier5e
.wa3as
.wa2n
.wee4t3
.weg1
.we4l
.wel5in
.we4n
.wer2
.wi4
.wig3
.wit3
.wors5
.y4s5k
.ys3l
.ywe4
.ywer5a
.z2
aa4
4aad
aad3e
aad3o
aad5u
aaf3
4aag
aag3a
aag3r
aag5sl
aag3sw
4aai
aak1
aak5l
aal3a
aal3e
aal3i
aal5k
aal3o
4aam
aam3e
aan3a
3aando
aan3e
aan5g
aan5k4
aan3o
aan5sk
aan5sl
aan3sp
aap3
a3a5pe
aap5l
4aaps
aar1a
aar4das
aar3e
aar3i
aar1o
aar5sw
aas5
aat3a
aat5e
aat3h
aat3o
aat1r
ab3la
ab5lak
a5blo
ab5lu
ab3ru
a4c
a5c.
a5ca
a5ce
a5cho
a5cr
a5cu
ad3aa
ad3ad
adaïs5
ad3ak
ada4m
4adi
a3dr
ad5s4o
adu3t
a1e
ael3sw
a2erm
a4ert
aë1
af3arm
af3eet
a4f3ek
afel3
a5fer
4aff
4afi
afie4
a4f3in
af1l
4afo
af4oe
af5oes
a5fon
afplei5
4af3r
5afri
af5rig
af5rit
af3s4
a4fu
ag3aa
ag4aan
a4gaap
a2g3ad
ag5ak
ag3av
4age.
a4gek
a4g3ew
4agi
ag3ins
agis4
4ag1l
4ago
ag4or
ag5ord
ag3re
a5groe
ag5sas
ag3sk
ag4ske
ag4sl
ag4s5n
ag3s4o
ag4sor
ag1sp
ag3s4wa
agte4r
ag2tu
ag3ui
a4g3uu
agvo4
ag3y
a3ha
ah3r
ai1
ai5k
ain4
ais4
2a1j
aje4
4a1ka
ak3ag
a4kal
ak3alw
ak3arb
a2kes
a1ki
akis4
a2k3l
ak4la
ak4le
a4k3n
a1ko
a4k3ok
a1kr
a4k3re
a4k3ru
ak5sj
ak5s4p
aktua4l5
a1ku
a2k3ui
ak3w
ak4wa
ak4wi
ak5ys
a1la
a4l3amm
alan5g
al3app
al3as.
a1le
a4l3ef
ale4s4
a4lew
al5ewi
alf1e
alg5aas
al3ke
alk5s
a1lo
a3loï
al3ou
alper4
alpers5
al4skr
al5tw
a1lu
alus4
am3adr
a4m3ag
am3akk
3amal
am5atoo
ame5raa
ame3s
4amg
am3oo
a4mou
am4pol
am4s5o
am5str
am4sw
anaga3
an3all
4anda
an5del
an4den
and5ens
an4d3om
and4oo
a5ne.
an3eff
aner5t
anfe4
4ang.
ang5aal
angbes5s
ange4da
an3gl
ang5la
ang5str
an5gu
anho4
an3ioo
an3ke
an2kl
an4kn
ank3w
anne5m
a1no
an4on
a2n3oo
an3sa
an5sar
ans5ink
an4ske
an4ski
an3sl
an5so
an2sp
an3s4we
an4tru
an3ui
an3uu
a3ny
a1o
a1pa
a4paa
ap3aan
apa3s
a3pe
ap3l
ap5laa
ap5lat
ap4le
ap4lu
apma5s
a1po
apo3p
a3pr
a4p3ry
ap3sa
aps4p
a1pu
ap3ui
a3py
a3ra
ara3p
4ard
ar4d3op
ard5w
a1re
aregi5
are3k
are4t
ar5f4
ar3gh
ar2gl
a1ri
arkaar5
ark5ana
ar5ke
ar4k3re
ark5s
a1ro
ar4skr
ar5sme
ar4spa
ar4spr
ars5te.
ars5ter
ar5stig
ar4s3w
ar4tas
ar2t3j
ar4t3op
ar4t3ro
art4sl
ar3ui
a1ry
ary3s
as3ag
a5sak
as3ank
a3sar
a4sc
a4s3eg
a4s3ei
as3eks
as5ele
as3ete
a4s5f
a1sj
as3k
as5kl
as3l
as4lan
as5li
as5me.
as3n
a2s3o
as4on
as5ond
a3sos
a3sot
as3p
as4sep
assi4m3
as3t
as4tan
a4ste
as5ten
as5ter
as5tie
as4traa
a4s3w
as5we
as3ys
a1ta
at3aar
at3ag
ata5la
at3ann
ata3s
at2he
at1j
4atn
a1to
at3ogi
at3oor
a1tr
a4t3ru
at3ry.
at3ryk
at4sek
at4sin
at4ske
at4s3kr
at4sle
at4slo
at4sn
at4s3on
at4spr
at4sto
at4str
a1tu
atvoet5j
at5w
atwil3
at3ys5
4au
au5b
aure3
au3s4
a3uu
awa3g
awe4r3a
a3xi
a3y
azi4
3ä2
3b
4b.
5baa
5bad
ba4e
ba3kl
ba2k3o
b3aksi
5baku
bak5w
ba3la
balu3
ban4da
ban4d3r
bandys5
bar4s3
5bas
ba3s4a
ba4sek
bas5m
ba3t4j
bat4s3
4b5b
bba3s
4b4c
4b5d4
5be.
5bea
be3dw
bee4
been3
bee5tj
be3fl
be3g
5bei
be4kri
5bel
belkaart5
bel4o
be5loo
bels4
bel3sw
5bem
5ben
5ber
ber4gl
ber4gr
ber4i
be1ro
be3ru
be1s
be5se
be3s4k
be5ski
be3sm
bes4p
be3s4t
bes5te.
be5stik
be3tw
5bê
4bf
b2h
5b4i
bie4g3
bi5k
bi3la
bi3sa
bi3tr
4b1j
4b1k
b4l4
b5lau
5bli
blo2
blok3r
blo4m3
4bm
4b3n
b4o
bo5be
bog5s
bo4kl
bo5kle
bo4kr
bo4k5w
bo4ma
bom3aa
bon2t
boom5
bo3p
bor4s3k
bor4s3l
bor4st
bo4sa
bo3sko
bo4s3o
bo3tr
bo3tsw
bou3s
bou3ta
b3r.
5bra
brek5l
5bri
2b3rog
bro4sk
brul3
4b1s4
b4see
b4s5l
b5ste
5bu
bui5te
bus5k
4bv
4bw
5by
by3f4
by3k4
by3na
by3p
by3s4
by5sk
bys5ter
by3tr
1c2
ca5ch
ca4e
ca3f
3car
ca3ru
ca3th
2c3c
ce3ro
3ces3
5ch.
5chr
2cht
ch3w
5ci
ci3e
2ck
c3ke
c3ki
ck3n
co5b
co4ch
com3p
con3g
cray3
2c3t
cti4
3cu
cu3i.
c4z
2d.
1da
5d4a.
d4aal
d3aand
4d3aans
4d3aap
d3abs
5dadi
2d3af
da2g5a
dagi4
dagkaar5
da4gor
da4gr
dag5so
daïs4
4dakk
da3ky
4dala
d3alar
dame4
da4na
dan3as
da3re
4d3arm
4d3art
2d3ase
5dasi
da3s4t
da4s5tr
da5te
4d3atl
4d3atm
5dau
2d5b
dbor4
dbors5
4d3d4
dda5s
dde4r
dder3a
3de
4d3eek
4d3een
deer4t
deert5j
de3f
4d3eg.
dehart5
4dei
d3eis
de5ka
de4k5laa
de4koe
de4kri
4d3eksa
dek5ste
4d3elem
de4len
de5li
4delmo
del2s
dels5on
del4str
dels3w
5dem
demp5l
4d3eng
5denk
denk5l
dens3p
den4t5in
de5rab
der5ent
de4r3es
derge5b
der4i
derk4
der3o
de3rol
de3r4u
de4sa
des5aa
de5sag
de3skr
de3s4m
des5n
de4so
des3on
de2sp
de3st
des4te
de4sti
d3ete.
5detr
4d3ets
de3tw
deu2
deur5
de3us.
dewê4
3dê
4d5f4
2d1g
dgun5
2dh
d5he
d4hi
3di
dias4
4dide
5die
di4g5a
di3glo
dik5l
di4k3r
dil3al
5ding
4d3inw
di5se
di4sk
di2so
dis4pen
dit5j
2d1j
2d1k
dkaart4
dkaar5tj
2d1l
2d1m
2d1n
1do
do5br
4doef
doe3st
2dof
4doff
4d5ogi
5dol.
do4l3os
do4m3a3
4domd
4domh
5domi
do4mo
do5mon
d3omse
dom4st
4d3omt
4d3ont
5dood
d4ooi
d5oord
doper4
do4p5ert5
4d3ord
dor4sl
do3sk
dot4
do3tj
dou5
2d1p
1dr4
3dra
d3raak
dran2
drank5
4dras
dra5sta
2dre
d3red
d3rep
3drew
dri4a
dries4
d3rigt
4d3rit
d5roll
d5rond
d5roof
d5roos
drop4
dro3pn
2d3rug
d3ruim
4d3ry.
2d3ryk
4d3rym
d3ryp
5dryw
2ds
ds3aks
d5sal
d4s3an
ds3ar
ds3een
d4sen
ds3eng
ds5ertj
ds3ins
ds3j
d1sk
d5skar
d5s4ke
d3skoo
d4s5kopp
d5skr
ds3le
ds4len
d4sli
ds4med
d3smee
d3s4mi
ds4moo
d3sn
d5sni
d4so
d5sol
ds3om
ds3onm
ds3oo
ds3op
ds4op.
d1sp
d3spoo
d3spre
d3st
d4staal
d4staf
d4stek
d4stem
ds4ti
d4stoe
d5stra
d4sty
ds3w
d4swe
ds5weë
ds4wer
ds5wi
d4s4wo
2d5t
dtas5
dter4
dtert3
3d4u
du5be
du5bl
5dui.
5duif
d3uit
dur4
du3um
2dv
2d3w
d5waar
d4war
4d5wat
d5wek
d4wen
dwer4
d5wes
d5wil
d5wor
4dwu
1dy
dy3sp
3dy5su
4d3yw
4dz
e3a
e5aa
e5af
e5ag
eam4
e5an
eangs5
e5ba
e5bla
e5b4r
4ec
ecres3
e1d
e3da
e5dat
eddor5
ed3ei
edel5s
ede5res
ede2s
ed5h
e3do
ed3off
e3dr
e5dra
e5dri
e5dru
e3dsj
ed3sk
eds4t
ed5sta
ed5ste
ed5uit
edu3s4
ed4w
ed5wy
ed3ys
ee2
ee4da
eed3aa
ee5dan
ee5do
eed5w
ee3e
ee4f
ee5fon
eeg3i
e3ei
ee3in
eek3on
eek3r
eek5sk
eek5sp
eek5st
eek3uu
eek3w
eel1a
ee3las
eel3m
eel3o
eel5st
eel3sw
4eelv
e4em
eems5
e4e4n
een5a
een1o
een5sa
een5so
eep3an
eeper4
eepers5k
eep3l
ee3ra
ee3re
ee4r3ee
eerga5w
eerma4s
eer3o
ee3r4ow
eer4s5oo
eerste5k
4ees3
ee4sa
eeska4d
ees5li
ees5m
ee3sn
ees4o
ee3s4p
ees4ta
ee5staa
ee4t3i
eet5oo
eet4r
eet5re
eet5s
ee4u3
eeug4
eeus4
eeu5t
e3ê
eë4le
eë3ra
ef3as
efbeamp5
ef3eks
e3fen
e3fla
ef4lee
e5flo
e3flu
e4f5ou
e3fr
ef3rek
e5fro
ef3ru
ef4s3ke
e4fy
e3ga
egas4
e4ge.
ege3st
4egi
egi4s
egkaart5
eg3le
eg3ogg
eg3ond
eg3oor
eg3op
eg3sk
egs5ken
eg4so
egs3p
eg5s4pre
eg3ui
e3gy
eg3ys
e3h
ehart4j
eheu3
4ei.
ei1e
eie5so
4eig
ei4ka
ei5kl
ei5kw
ei4naa
ei4nar
ei4no
ei5noo
eis3ag
ei4s3ek
ei5sja
ei4su
eit2
ei3tj
ei3tra
e3j
e3ka
ek3af
e4kak
e3ke
e5ke.
ek3een
ek4en
eke5p
ek3erf
e4k3es
e3kê
ekflui5
e3k4hoe
e1ki
ek3les
ek4li
ek5lik.
e3kn
ek3na
ek3nu
e3ko
ek3oes
ek3opm
e1kr
e3kra
ek3rie
e5kru
eks4a
ek5si
ek4skr
eks4m
ek3smo
3ekspl
ek4ste
ek3sw
ek5t.
e3ku
eku5t
e1kw
e4kwy
e3ky
e1la
el3aan
el3aap
el3af
e2l3ag
el3al
el3arm
el4as
ela3sl
elda5e
e3le
e5le.
e4l3eeu
el3eng
e4lery
e5lew
el4f3a
el3fe
e3li
e4lië
e4link
elk5s4
el4m3ag
e1lo
e3lob
e2l3ol
el3ond
e4l5ooi
e4l3oon
el3opg
el3opt
e2l3or
el3smi
el4staa
el5stre
e3lu
e5lug
el3uit
e5lum
elu5r
el3uu
e1ly
em3as.
e3mee
emeu3l
e3mo
e5moe
e5mol
em3op
em3org
em4p3r
em4sl
e3mu
en3aap
en3af
e2n3ag
e4nal
en3al.
en3ama
en5d4a
en4det
en3dr
ends5o
en3d4w
e3ne
en3ei
en3ent
e4n3ert3
e3ni
en3in.
en5ke
enkom4
en4kro
enk3w
e1no
en3ore
en4ses
ens5ess
en4skr
en4so
ens5on
ens3oo
ens4pa
en4spe
ens4po
ens5tig
en4s3ui
en5t4a
en3tle
en4tro
entwe5
en3ui
en3uu
e3ny
4e3o
eog4
eoor5
e5or
eo3s4
e1pa
e5pad
ep3ag
e5pe
epin4
e1pl
ep5lat
e3po
e3pr
e5pru
ep4sa
epsa5g
ep2s3w
e1pu
e3py
e4r.
e1ra
e3ra.
er3aan
e4r3aap
e2r3af
er5afs
er1ag
er5agt
e3rak
er3aks
er3all
er3ana
e5randa
er3app
er3ar
er5arg
e4r3as.
e5rasi
er3ast
erbank5
erd4o
er5dom
er5dor
er3dw
e1re
e5re.
er3een
er3eff
er3eie
er3eil
e3r4ek
er3eks
e3rem
e3rend
e4reni
e3res
ere5sl
ere3s4t
er5eter
er4fu
erga4w
er5g4e
ergren5d
e3ri
e5rie
e5rif
e5rig
erig3a
e4rim
er3ime
e5ring
er3inn
er3int
e5rio
er4kad
e3rob
e3rod
e3roe
er3oë
e3rog
e5roïe
er3oks
e3rol.
er3oli
er3om.
e3roni
er3oog
e3rooi
e3roon
e3roos
er5oot
er1op
e4r3or
e3rot
er3oud
er3oue
er3ow
er4sag
er4sei
er3soo
er5str
er5te
er5t4o
er4tri
er3twi
e1ru
e2r3ui
er5uu
e1ry
er5yd
er3yst
e3sa
es4aa
es3af
es3agt
e5sak
e5s4an
es3apo
e5sas
e4sc
e4sei
ese4la
ese3st
es5g
e3sj
es4je
e1sk
es4kap
e3sker
e3ski
e3skoe
eskolle5
es4koo
es3kra
e1sl
e3s4la
e5slang
es4leu4
es4li
es5lie
es3lop
e5smar
es4me
es5mer
es4mo
e3smou
es4n
es3ni
e3so
e5soe
esoe5t4
es4of
es5off
es3ok
es5oli
es5om
es4op
es5opn
e5sor
e5sou
e1sp
e5s4pel
es3pil
es3pir
e5spoe
es4pr
e5spro
es5se
es5ta.
es4tal
es3tas
e4s3te.
es3ter
es4teu
e2sti
e4stik
es4tit
e5stok
e3s4tr
e3stu
esu3m.
es3ur
es4wa
e3sy
4et.
e3ta
e5taal
et3afd
e4t3ag
e5tak
et3ana
e3te
e5tek
et3emp
eter4a
ete4te
e4til
e3tj
e1to
e3toe
e5tog
et3oli
e3ton
et4oog
e4t3oor
e3t4op
e1tr
e5tra
et3rot
et4ska
et4sko
et4sn
et5sne
et5sno
et2so
et4s3pr
et5ste
ette5ra
e3tu
etu3u
et5wa
et5we
et3ys5
eu5b
eu4er
eu5ga
e3ui
e4uil
e5uit
eu4ka
eu4ko
euk5w
eu4lo
e1um.
4eun
eu4na
eun5s
eu4p3r
eu2ra
eur3aa
e3usg
eus4n
eu5tra
eu5tri
4e3uu
ever4bl
e3w
e5wa
ewan4
4ewee
ewe5ga
e5wi
ewie4
e5wo
ex3
e3ys
e3yw
e4z
e5za
é3
3è3
ê1e
ê3f
ê3l
ê3p
ê1re
ê4reh
ê3ri
ê3s
ê4sk
êvo4
3ë
ë3a
ë1d
ë3ee
ë3fr
ë3k
ëko4
ëkop3
ë3la
ë4l3as
ë3le
ë5lee
ël3ei
ël3en
ë3lo
ël3or
ël3sk
ë3lu
ël3y
ë4ner
ën3s
ë1p
ër3ar
ë3rat
ë3re
ë3ri
ë3ro
ë4ro.
ë3ru
ë3ry
ë1s
ës4p
ë1t
ëtas5
ë3y
2f.
1fa
5fa.
f3aanb
f3aap
2f3aar
f3aas
2f3ad
4faf
f3ag
f4agu
f3amp
2f3ap
4farm
5fau
2fb
fbeamp4
4f3d4
fde4s
f4dh
1fe
fee4
3feg
feggi5
fek5s4
3fel
fe2la
fe3laa
fe2l3y
f3ent
3fer
fe4ran
fe3ro
fer4s3k
fes3
fe4u
fê3
4f1f4
ffe4t3
f5fu
f1g
fgele4
fguns5
4fh
3fi
fi5d
5fie
5fini
fis5t
f1j
2f1k
f5law
f3lee
f5lees
f2lit
flo4k3
f3lus
f3ly
4f5m
f1n
fna4
fni2s
1fo
2f3of
fok4s
foks5t
folk5
fond4
f3ons
2f3o2p3
5fori
fo3ru
3f4ou
2f3p
3f4ras
f3reë
fre5l
f2ren
f4ri
f5rib
3fric
1frik
3f4rod
fru5ga
f3ry
2f1s
fs3ar
fs3ekw
f5ser
fsk5uw
fslin4
fsling5
f3s4m
fs4n
fs5oor
fs4p
fs4w
fs3yw
4f1t
fti4g3r
3fu
fu4c
fu5g
4fui
5fur
fus4
f3uu
f5uur
4fw
3fy
4f3ys
2g.
1ga
5g4a.
g4aal
gaam4s3
g4aan.
gaar3t4
g4aat
ga4e
2g3af
4gaf.
2g3ag
2g3ak
ga3k4w
ga4lap
gal4ga
ga5lo
gang4s3
g3anke
gank5l
garet3
2g3arm
gar4s
4gart
ga4sa
2g3ase
gat5s
2gb
gbaad4
gbes4
2g1d
g5de
gder4
g3do
3ge
ge3d
gee4
gees5
geet3a
4ge3f
5gefe
g3eff
gef2l
4g3eg.
ge3gl
gei3
g4ek
5geko
gekun5
gek4w
ge5ky
g4el
ge3la
gel4da
ge5le
ge3lo
ge4lon
gel4oo
gel4se
gels5er
gel4st
4gemm
ge5n4e
g3enj
g3enp
geo3g
ge4ral
gere4ë
ge4res
ger5es.
ge4r3et
ge5ri
ge1ro
ge3r4u
ge1s4
ge5sm
ge5spa
ges5te.
ge5sw
ge3t
5g4ewa
5gewee
2g1f
2g3g4
ggi4o
3gha.
ghar3t4
3g4hi
3ghr
3gi
4g5iem
gi4f
ging4
gi5se
gis5te
gi3str
gis4tre
gi3tr
g3j
2g1k
gkaart4
gkoe4r
g5lam
glan4
glan5de
5g4lans
5g2las
g4lia
g4lim
g2lip
g3lo.
3glob
4g3lod
5g2loe
5glof
g3lok
5glom
g3loo
g5lop
g5lus
5g4luu
g5lyf
glyk4
4g3m
g1n
g3naa
gneem5
1go
go5b
3god
god4s
3goed
4goef
4goe5t
2g3of
go3la
g3ong
gon4s
g3ont
g4ooi
g4ool
2goor
2gop
go3pl
g3opn
g3opt
2g3org
g5ork
gos4
4g3os.
4g3osg
3go3sk
got3s
gou4d3
2g3p
1gr
3gra
gra4m
g3ramp
4grat
g3rea
2g3red
g3reë
gre5l
greli5
g4ret
gre4t3j
g4reu
g4rif
grip2
4g3rok
3g4ron2
g3roos
2gru
g3rug
g3ruk
2g3rye
2g3ryk
4g3rym
grys5k
g3ryt
2gs
g4s3ad
gs3af
gs3age
g3sap
gs3ar
g4sas
gs3een
gs3ein
g4sek
gs3eks
